Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Account" or "ABLE savings
account" means an individual savings account established in accordance
with this chapter.

"Account owner" means the person who
enters into a savings agreement pursuant to this chapter.

"Designated beneficiary" means a
resident of the State whose qualified disability expenses may be paid from the
account.

"Director" means the director of
finance.

"Eligible individual" means an
individual who is entitled to benefits based on blindness or disability under
title 42 United States Code section 401 et seq. or title 42 United States Code
section 1381 et seq., as amended, and for whom blindness or disability occurred
before the date on which the individual attained the age of twenty-six, or an
individual who filed for the taxable year, a disability certification with and
to the satisfaction of the Secretary.

"Financial organization" means an
organization authorized to do business in the State that is:

(1) Licensed or chartered by the insurance
commissioner;

(2) Licensed or chartered by the commissioner of
financial institutions;

(3) Chartered by an agency of the federal government;
or

(4) Subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of the
federal Securities and Exchange Commission.

"Management contract" means the
contract executed by the director of finance and a financial organization
selected to act as a depository and manager of the program.

"Member of the family" has the same
meaning defined in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended.

"Nonqualified withdrawal" means a
withdrawal from an account that is not:

(1) A qualified withdrawal; or

(2) A rollover distribution.

"Program" means the Hawaii ABLE
savings program established under this chapter.

"Program manager" means a financial
organization selected by the director of finance to act as a depository and
manager of the program.

"Qualified disability expense" means
any qualified disability expense included in section 529A of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

"Qualified withdrawal" means a
withdrawal from an account to pay the qualified disability expenses of the
designated beneficiary of the account.

"Rollover distribution" means a
rollover distribution as defined in section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended.

"Savings agreement" means an
agreement between the program manager or the director of finance and the
account owner.

"Secretary" means the secretary of
the United States Department of the Treasury. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next